Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-303
State Department of Education Revolving Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The State Department of Education may provide for a system of charges for services rendered by the administrative support programs of the department to all other programs within the department. Such charges received for administrative support services shall be credited to the State Department of Education Revolving Fund, which fund is hereby created. Expenditures shall be made from such fund to finance the operation of the administrative support programs of the department in accordance with appropriations made by the Legislature.

(2) The Director of Administrative Services, upon receipt of proper vouchers approved by the Commissioner of Education, shall issue warrants out of the State Department of Education Revolving Fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the State Department of Education Revolving Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1978, LB 962, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 88;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-340;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 131;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 176.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.